public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/test.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi -àr inregolari ((dex)dar, (kon|kontra|[lƚ]iku[ei]|putre|rare|re|sora|stra|stupe|tore|tume)far, (mal|move|soto)star)
# themeT1 + r/h0h1h2E0E1E2
# themeT8 + o/h0h1h2E0E1E2I0J0
# themeT8 + oe/h0h1h2E0E1E2I0J0
# themeT6 + do/T0Y0
# themeT6 + da/D0Y0
SFX h0 Y 256
SFX h0 0 ane/K0 ar
SFX h0 0 atu/M0 ar
SFX h0 0 ave/F0 ar
SFX h0 0 e ar
SFX h0 0 emo/E0E1E2J0 ar
SFX h0 0 en/J0 ar
SFX h0 0 ene/K0 ar
SFX h0 0 ense ar
SFX h0 0 esi/N0 ar
SFX h0 0 esiu/O0 ar
SFX h0 0 ion/E0E1E2J0 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX h0 0 ione/K0 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX h0 0 ionme/G0G1 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX h0 0 isen/J0 ar
SFX h0 0 isene/K0 ar
SFX h0 0 isense ar
SFX h0 0 ision/J0 ar
SFX h0 0 isione/K0 ar
SFX h0 0 isionse ar
SFX h0 0 isié/N0 ar
SFX h0 0 isiéu/O0 ar
SFX h0 0 ison/J0 ar
SFX h0 0 isone/K0 ar
SFX h0 0 isonse ar
SFX h0 0 ié/N0 ar
SFX h0 0 iéu/O0 ar
SFX h0 0 iónmene/G0 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX h0 0 me/G0 ar
SFX h0 0 on/E0E1E2J0 ar
SFX h0 0 one/K0 ar
SFX h0 0 onme/G0G1 ar
SFX h0 0 à/F0J0L0 ar
SFX h0 0 àe/F0 ar
SFX h0 0 è/J0 ar
SFX h0 0 ène/K0 ar
SFX h0 0 é/N0 ar
SFX h0 0 émoe/K0 ar
SFX h0 0 ésimo/J0 ar
SFX h0 0 ésimoe/K0 ar
SFX h0 0 ésitu/M0 ar
SFX h0 0 éu/O0 ar
SFX h0 0 ía/F0J0L0 ar
SFX h0 0 íane/K0 ar
SFX h0 0 íatu/M0 ar
SFX h0 0 íe/F0J0 ar
SFX h0 0 íene/K0 ar
SFX h0 0 ò/J0 ar
SFX h0 0 òe/K0 ar
SFX h0 0 ónmene/G0 ar
SFX h0 ar ede/N0 ar
SFX h0 ar ege/N0 ar
SFX h0 ar emo/E0E1E2J0 ar
SFX h0 ar en/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar endo/E0E1E2 ar
SFX h0 ar ene/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar ense ar
SFX h0 ar ente/T0I0 ar
SFX h0 ar ento/E0E1E2 ar
SFX h0 ar erane/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar eratu/M0 ar
SFX h0 ar erave/F0 ar
SFX h0 ar eremo/E0E1E2J0 ar
SFX h0 ar eren/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar erene/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar erense ar
SFX h0 ar eresi/N0 ar
SFX h0 ar eresiu/O0 ar
SFX h0 ar erion/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar erione/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar erionse ar
SFX h0 ar erisen/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar erisene/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar erisense ar
SFX h0 ar erisi/N0 ar
SFX h0 ar erision/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar erisione/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar erisionse ar
SFX h0 ar erisiu/O0 ar
SFX h0 ar erisié/N0 ar
SFX h0 ar erisiéu/O0 ar
SFX h0 ar erison/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar erisone/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar erisonse ar
SFX h0 ar erié/N0 ar
SFX h0 ar eriéu/O0 ar
SFX h0 ar eron/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar erone/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar eronse ar
SFX h0 ar erà/F0J0L0 ar
SFX h0 ar eràe/F0 ar
SFX h0 ar eràvene/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar erè/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar erène/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar eré/N0 ar
SFX h0 ar erémoe/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar erémome/G0 ar
SFX h0 ar erémomene/G0 ar
SFX h0 ar erésimo/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar erésimoe/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar erésitu/M0 ar
SFX h0 ar eréu/O0 ar
SFX h0 ar ería/F0J0L0 ar
SFX h0 ar eríane/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar eríatu/M0 ar
SFX h0 ar eríe/F0J0 ar
SFX h0 ar eríene/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar erísitu/M0 ar
SFX h0 ar erò/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar eròe/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar ese/I0T0 ar
SFX h0 ar esto/B0I0 ar
SFX h0 ar eva/F0J0N0 ar
SFX h0 ar eve/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar evi/J0L0N0 ar
SFX h0 ar evo/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar iede/N0 ar
SFX h0 ar iege/N0 ar
SFX h0 ar ion/E0E1E2J0 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX h0 ar ione/K0 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX h0 ar ionme/G0G1 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX h0 ar isen/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar isene/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar isense ar
SFX h0 ar isiede/N0 ar
SFX h0 ar isiege/N0 ar
SFX h0 ar ision/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar isione/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar isionse ar
SFX h0 ar isié/N0 ar
SFX h0 ar ison/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar isone/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar isonse ar
SFX h0 ar iven/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar ivene/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar ivense ar
SFX h0 ar ivion/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar ivione/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar ivionse ar
SFX h0 ar ivié/N0 ar
SFX h0 ar iviéu/O0 ar
SFX h0 ar ivon/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar ivone/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar ivonse ar
SFX h0 ar ié/N0 ar
SFX h0 ar iéu/O0 ar
SFX h0 ar iónmene/G0 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX h0 ar on/E0E1E2J0 ar
SFX h0 ar one/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar onme/G0G1 ar
SFX h0 ar à/E0E1E2 ar
SFX h0 ar àa/D0F0J0N0 ar
SFX h0 ar àau/O0 ar
SFX h0 ar àe/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar ài/J0L0N0 ar
SFX h0 ar àimo/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar àimoe/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar àmene/G0 ar
SFX h0 ar àndome/G0 ar
SFX h0 ar àndomene/G0 ar
SFX h0 ar àntome/G0 ar
SFX h0 ar àntomene/G0 ar
SFX h0 ar ào/J0T0 ar
SFX h0 ar àrmene/G0 ar
SFX h0 ar àsimo ar
SFX h0 ar àsitu/M0 ar
SFX h0 ar àvane/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar àvau/O0 ar
SFX h0 ar àvene/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar àvimo/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar àvimoe/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar àvitu/M0 ar
SFX h0 ar àvone/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar è/F0N0 ar
SFX h0 ar ème/G0 ar
SFX h0 ar èmene/G0 ar
SFX h0 ar èu/O0 ar
SFX h0 ar é/F0N0 ar
SFX h0 ar éa/F0J0N0 ar
SFX h0 ar éane/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar éau/O0 ar
SFX h0 ar ée/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar éene/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar éi/J0L0N0 ar
SFX h0 ar éimo/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar éimoe/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar éitu/M0 ar
SFX h0 ar émoe/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar émome/G0 ar
SFX h0 ar émomene/G0 ar
SFX h0 ar éndome/G0 ar
SFX h0 ar éndomene/G0 ar
SFX h0 ar éntome/G0 ar
SFX h0 ar éntomene/G0 ar
SFX h0 ar éo/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar éone/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar ésimo ar
SFX h0 ar éu/O0 ar
SFX h0 ar évane/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar évau/O0 ar
SFX h0 ar évene/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar évimo/J0 ar
SFX h0 ar évimoe/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar évitu/M0 ar
SFX h0 ar évone/K0 ar
SFX h0 ar ò ar
SFX h0 ar ónmene/G0 ar
SFX h0 e me/G0 oe
SFX h0 e mene/G0 oe
SFX h0 e ne/K0T0 oe
SFX h0 e nte/T0I0 oe
SFX h0 e nto oe
SFX h0 e te/T0 oe
SFX h0 e u/O0 oe
SFX h0 o a/E0E1E2F0 o
SFX h0 o e/E0E1E2F0I0J0 o
SFX h0 o i/E0E1E2F0L0 o
SFX h0 oe ae/T0 oe
SFX h0 oe ame/G0 oe
SFX h0 oe amene/G0 oe
SFX h0 oe ane/K0 oe
SFX h0 oe ee/T0 oe
SFX h0 oe eme/G0 oe
SFX h0 oe emene/G0 oe
SFX h0 oe ene/K0 oe
SFX h0 oe gae/T0 oe
SFX h0 oe game/G0 oe
SFX h0 oe gamene/G0 oe
SFX h0 oe gane/K0 oe
SFX h0 oe gime/G0 oe
SFX h0 oe gimene/G0 oe
SFX h0 oe gine/K0 oe
SFX h0 oe gitu/M0 oe
SFX h0 oe gone/K0 oe
SFX h0 oe ime/G0 oe
SFX h0 oe imene/G0 oe
SFX h0 oe ine/K0 oe
SFX h0 oe itu/M0 oe
SFX h0 r do/B0I0 ar
SFX h0 r gando/E0E1E2 ar
SFX h0 r gàndome/G0 ar
SFX h0 r gàndomene/G0 ar
SFX h0 r gàntome/G0 ar
SFX h0 r gàntomene/G0 ar
SFX h0 r me/G0 ar
SFX h0 r ndo/E0E1E2 ar
SFX h0 r nte/T0I0 ar
SFX h0 r nto/E0E1E2 ar
SFX h0 r se/I0T0 ar
SFX h0 r sto/B0I0 ar
SFX h0 r va/F0J0N0 ar
SFX h0 r ve/J0 ar
SFX h0 r vi/J0L0N0 ar
SFX h0 r vo/J0 ar
SFX h0 ào aga/E0E1E2F0 ào
SFX h0 ào agi/E0E1E2F0L0 ào
SFX h0 ào ago/E0E1E2I0J0 ào

# vèrbi -àr inregolari ((dex)dar, (kon|kontra|[lƚ]iku[ei]|putre|rare|re|sora|stra|stupe|tore|tume)far, (mal|move|soto)star)
# themeT1 + r/h0h1h2E0E1E2
# themeT8 + o/h0h1h2E0E1E2I0J0
# themeT8 + oe/h0h1h2E0E1E2I0J0
# themeT6 + do/T0Y0
# themeT6 + da/D0Y0
SFX h1 Y 71
SFX h1 0 alo/B0 ar
SFX h1 0 ave-lo/B0 ar
SFX h1 0 iónmelo/G1 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX h1 0 lo/G1 ar
SFX h1 0 à-lo/B0 ar
SFX h1 0 àe-lo/B0 ar
SFX h1 0 àvelo/B0 ar
SFX h1 0 íe-lo/B0 ar
SFX h1 0 íelo/B0 ar
SFX h1 0 íselo/Q1 ar
SFX h1 0 ónmelo/G1 ar
SFX h1 ar elo/B0 ar
SFX h1 ar eralo/B0 ar
SFX h1 ar erave-lo/B0 ar
SFX h1 ar erà-lo/B0 ar
SFX h1 ar eràe-lo/B0 ar
SFX h1 ar eràelo/B0 ar
SFX h1 ar eràvelo/B0 ar
SFX h1 ar erémolo/G1 ar
SFX h1 ar erémomelo/G1 ar
SFX h1 ar eríe-lo/B0 ar
SFX h1 ar eríelo/B0 ar
SFX h1 ar eríselo/Q1 ar
SFX h1 ar eve-lo/B0 ar
SFX h1 ar iónmelo/G1 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX h1 ar àmelo/G1 ar
SFX h1 ar àndolo/G1 ar
SFX h1 ar àndomelo/G1 ar
SFX h1 ar àntolo/G1 ar
SFX h1 ar àntomelo/G1 ar
SFX h1 ar àrmelo/G1 ar
SFX h1 ar àvelo/B0 ar
SFX h1 ar è-lo/B0 ar
SFX h1 ar èlo/B0 ar
SFX h1 ar èlo/G1 ar
SFX h1 ar èmelo/G1 ar
SFX h1 ar é-lo/B0 ar
SFX h1 ar ée-lo/B0 ar
SFX h1 ar éelo/B0 ar
SFX h1 ar émolo/G1 ar
SFX h1 ar émomelo/G1 ar
SFX h1 ar éndolo/G1 ar
SFX h1 ar éndomelo/G1 ar
SFX h1 ar éntolo/G1 ar
SFX h1 ar éntomelo/G1 ar
SFX h1 ar évelo/B0 ar
SFX h1 ar ónmelo/G1 ar
SFX h1 e lo/G1 oe
SFX h1 e melo/G1 oe
SFX h1 o -lo/B0 ào
SFX h1 o e-lo/B0 o
SFX h1 o elo/B0 o
SFX h1 o gelo/B0 ào
SFX h1 oe alo/G1 oe
SFX h1 oe amelo/G1 oe
SFX h1 oe elo/G1 oe
SFX h1 oe emelo/G1 oe
SFX h1 oe galo/G1 oe
SFX h1 oe gamelo/G1 oe
SFX h1 oe gilo/G1 oe
SFX h1 oe gimelo/G1 oe
SFX h1 oe ilo/G1 oe
SFX h1 oe imelo/G1 oe
SFX h1 r gàndolo/G1 ar
SFX h1 r gàndomelo/G1 ar
SFX h1 r gàntolo/G1 ar
SFX h1 r gàntomelo/G1 ar
SFX h1 r lo/G1 ar
SFX h1 r ve-lo/B0 ar
SFX h1 ào age-lo/B0 ào
SFX h1 ào alo/B0 ào
