public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/test.dic
star/h0h1h2E0E1E2
stào/h0h1h2E0E1E2I0J0
stàoe/h0h1h2E0E1E2I0J0
malstar/h0h1h2E0E1E2
malstao/h0h1h2E0E1E2I0J0
malstàoe/h0h1h2E0E1E2I0J0
movestar/h0h1h2E0E1E2
movestao/h0h1h2E0E1E2I0J0
movestàoe/h0h1h2E0E1E2I0J0
sotostar/h0h1h2E0E1E2
sotostao/h0h1h2E0E1E2I0J0
sotostàoe/h0h1h2E0E1E2I0J0
vào/h0h1h2i0J0
revào/h0h1h2i0J0
dar/h0h1h2E0E1E2+0
dào/h0h1h2E0E1E2I0J0+0
dàoe/h0h1h2E0E1E2I0J0+0
